Utah statutes.
20A-7-206.   Submitting the initiative petition -- Certification of
signatures by the county clerks -- Transfer to lieutenant governor.
(1)  In order to qualify an initiative petition for placement on the regular
general election ballot, the sponsors shall deliver each signed and verified
initiative packet to the county clerk of the county in which the packet was
circulated no later than April 15 before the regular general election.
(2)  No later than May 1 before the regular general election, the county clerk
shall:
(a)  check the names of all persons completing the verification for the
initiative packet to determine whether or not those persons are residents of
Utah and are at least 18 years old; and
(b)  submit the name of each of those persons who is not a Utah resident or
who is not at least 18 years old to the attorney general and county attorney.
(3)  No later than May 15 before the regular general election, the county
clerk shall:
(a)  determine whether or not each signer is a registered voter according to
the requirements of Section 20A-7-206.3;
(b)  certify on the petition whether or not each name is that of a registered
voter; and
(c)  deliver all of the packets to the lieutenant governor.
(4)  In order to qualify an initiative petition for submission to the
Legislature, the sponsors shall deliver each signed and verified initiative
packet to the county clerk of the county in which the packet was circulated by
the November 15 before the annual general session of the Legislature.
(5)  No later than December 1 before the annual general session of the
Legislature, the county clerk shall:
(a)  check the names of all persons completing the verification for the
initiative packet to determine whether or not those persons are Utah residents
and are at least 18 years old; and
(b)  submit the name of each of those persons who is not a Utah resident or
who is not at least 18 years old to the attorney general and county attorney.
(6)  No later than December 15 before the annual general session of the
Legislature, the county clerk shall:
(a)  determine whether or not each signer is a registered voter according to
the requirements of Section 20A-7-206.3;
(b)  certify on the petition whether or not each name is that of a registered
voter; and
(c)  deliver all of the packets to the lieutenant governor.
(7)  Initiative packets are public once they are delivered to the county
clerks.
(8)  The sponsor or their representatives may not retrieve initiative packets
from the county clerks once they have submitted them.
